Utah statutes.
75-5b-207.   Notice of proceeding.

If a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is brought in this state and this state was not the respondent's home state on the date the petition was filed, in addition to complying with the notice requirements of this state, notice of the petition shall be given to those persons who would be entitled to notice of the petition if the proceeding were brought in the respondent's home state.  The notice shall be given in the same manner as notice is given in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 253, 2008 General Session

